src/scripts/sme-smn-lemma.xfscript
! File to make sme into quasi-smn

! to compile:

! xfst -f sme-smn-lemma.xfscript

! to use:
! cat list | lookup smesmn.fst


define Vow  [ a|e|i|o|u|á ] ;

define initp b -> p  || [.#.|%-] _ ;
define initt d -> t  || [.#.|%-] _ ;
define initk g -> k  || [.#.|%-] _ ;


define CdnCn [ v d n -> v n 
             ] ;

define dnnn [  d n -> n n ,
             i d n -> i n ,
             l b m -> l m ,
             r b m -> r m ,
               d j -> i j ,
               p m -> m m ,
               k č -> h č ,
               k t -> p t ,
               k s -> p s 
              ] ;

define VowIK   i t -> š t , i k -> š k  || Vow _ ;

define hppttkk [ h p p -> p p ,
                 h t t -> t t ,
                 h k k -> k k ,
                 h c c -> c c ,
                 h č č -> č č 
                 ] ;

define hptk    [ h p -> p p ,
                 h t -> t t ,
                 h k -> k k ,
                 h c -> c c ,
                 h č -> č č 
                 ] ;

define aVow [ á -> ä  ] ;

define uaVow  o a -> u á ;
define iaVow  e a -> i ä ;
define yeVow  u o -> y e ;

               


define eeVow     e a -> e e ;


read regex [ 
initp
.o. initt
.o. initk    
.o. CdnCnn
.o. dnnn
.o. VowIK
.o. hppttkk
.o. hptk
.o. uaVow
.o. iaVow
.o. yeVow
.o. aVow
.o. eeVow
] ;

invert net ;


save stack smesmn.fst
